Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 Hospital Care for the Indigent Generally

Cross references.

Powers and duties of counties relating to support of paupers, T. 36, C. 12.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hospital care for the indigent, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-5.

31-8-1.
Establishment and purpose of program; administration.

In order to promote and preserve the health of the people of this state, there is established a Hospital Care for the Indigent Program to be administered by the Department of Community Health. The purpose of this program is to assist counties in the purchase of hospital care for persons who are ill or injured and who can be helped by treatment in a hospital but are financially unable to meet the full cost of hospital care from their own resources or from the resources of those upon whom they are legally dependent. The purchase of such hospital care shall be limited to the nonprofit basic cost of hospital care needed for the treatment of the ill or injured, as deemed necessary and ordered by the physician in charge of the case in accordance with this article and the rules, regulations, and standards adopted and promulgated pursuant to this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2301, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

Law reviews.

For article, “Privatization of Rural Public Hospitals: Implications for Access and Indigent Care,” see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 991 (1996).

For article, “Rural Health Care and State Antitrust Reform,” see 47 Mercer L. Rev. 1045 (1996).

31-8-2.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

(0.5)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Indigent person” means any resident who is ill or injured and who from his own resources or from the resources of those upon whom he is legally dependent is financially unable to meet the full cost of hospital care as prescribed or ordered by a physician. An allegedly indigent person shall not be considered an “indigent person” for the purposes of this article until and unless he shall be certified as an “indigent person” by the governing authority of his county of residence. If the governing authority shall fail or refuse to certify a person as an “indigent person” within five days after the next regular or special meeting of the governing authority receiving notice as to such person’s being admitted to a participating hospital, neither the county nor the hospital shall be responsible for any medical costs incurred by such person, but the person himself shall be responsible for all such costs.

“Participating county” means a county whose governing authority, by appropriate action, has agreed to participate in the program, is current with regard to its pro rata share of funds necessary for hospital care for its indigent persons, and is in compliance with this article.

“Participating hospital” means a publicly or privately owned hospital which holds a valid permit issued pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title, which has a physician as chief of staff, and whose governing authority has elected to participate in the program in accordance with this article.

“Physician” means a doctor of medicine duly licensed to practice medicine in this state in accordance with Chapter 34 of Title 43.

“Program” means the Hospital Care for the Indigent Program.

“Resident” means a person who receives health care from a hospital in the county in which he resides and who is in this state for other than temporary or transitory purposes and has lived continuously in the state for a period of not less than six months.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 2; Code 1933, § 88-2302, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 649, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-8/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-3.
Disbursement of state funds to counties.

State funds appropriated to the department for the purpose of carrying out this article shall be expended by the department so as to provide for the administration of this article as it deems necessary and proper and to assist counties in providing hospital care for indigent residents. The department shall establish a graduated matching formula for the disbursement of state funds to assist counties as provided in this article; provided, however, the state share of any participating county budget shall not exceed $1.00 per capita based on the latest official decennial population count of the United States Bureau of the Census. The department may establish an amount of state funds of the total state and county participating budget to provide hospital care for indigent resident patients who may be hospitalized outside of the county of residency; provided, however, that any unexpended state funds budgeted to provide hospital care for the indigent patient who may be hospitalized outside the county of residency may be reallocated by the department according to the matching formula.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 4; Code 1933, § 88-2304, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-4.
Qualification of counties for participation in program.

In order for a county to qualify for assistance under the program, the governing authority of said county shall have certified that:

The county elects to participate in the program;

A local budget providing the funds required by the graduated matching formula has been approved;

A local administrative agency or officer has been appointed; and

A screening committee or agency has been appointed to make determinations and certifications relative to indigency of persons applying for assistance as provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-2309, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-5.
Submission of budget by county.

After the implementation of this article, the governing authority of each participating county shall, on or before April 1 of each year, submit to the department a program budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of moneys needed to provide hospital care for the indigent residents for said county.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 5; Code 1933, § 88-2305, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-6.
Credit for expenditures by county.

Upon certification approved by the department, any participating county may receive credit for direct expenditures made during the period covered by the budget by the county to a hospital or hospitals when such expenditures can be shown to have been made for the care of indigent residents as defined in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-2306, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-8-7.
Qualifications for assistance under program; waiver of residence requirements in emergencies.

In order to qualify for assistance under this program, a person must be an indigent resident of this state and must be a person for whom hospital care is not available under any other program. The six-months’ residency requirement may be waived if a physician certifies that the illness or injury constitutes an emergency which requires immediate hospital care.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-2308, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-8.
Agreements between department and other governmental agencies or private organizations to obtain funds.

The department is authorized and empowered to enter into agreements with other state departments and boards, agencies of the United States government, local governmental agencies, and voluntary organizations to obtain funds for hospital care that may be available for needy persons; and the department is authorized to administer any funds received under such agreements in conformity with this article; provided, however, that the authority granted in this article shall not prevent the department from complying with 42 U.S.C.A. Section 701, et seq.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 10; Code 1933, § 88-2310, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-8-9.
Use of gifts and donations.

The department is authorized and empowered to accept and expend any and all gifts and donations that may be available to it for the purposes of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-2311, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-9.1.
Eligibility to receive tax credits; obligations of rural hospitals after receipt of funds; posting information on website.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Critical access hospital” means a hospital that meets the requirements of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to be designated as a critical access hospital and that is recognized by the department as a critical access hospital for purposes of Medicaid.

“Rural county” means a county having a population of less than 50,000 according to the United States decennial census of 2010 or any future such census; provided, however, that for counties which contain a military base or installation, the military personnel and their dependents living in such county shall be excluded from the total population of such county for purposes of this definition.

“Rural hospital organization” means an acute care hospital licensed by the department pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title that:

Provides inpatient hospital services at a facility located in a rural county or is a critical access hospital;

Participates in both Medicaid and medicare and accepts both Medicaid and medicare patients;

Provides health care services to indigent patients;

Has at least 10 percent of its annual net revenue categorized as indigent care, charity care, or bad debt;

Annually files IRS Form 990, Return of Organization Exempt From Income Tax, with the department, or for any hospital not required to file IRS Form 990, the department will provide a form that collects the same information to be submitted to the department on an annual basis;

Is operated by a county or municipal authority pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of this title or is designated as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

Is current with all audits and reports required by law; and

Has a three-year average patient margin, as a percent of expense, less than one standard deviation above the state-wide three-year average of organizations defined in subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this paragraph, as calculated by the department. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “patient margin” means gross patient revenues less contractual adjustments, bad debt, indigent and charity care, other uncompensated care, and total expenses.

By December 1 of each year, the department shall approve a list of rural hospital organizations eligible to receive contributions from the tax credit provided pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20 and transmit such list to the Department of Revenue.

Before any rural hospital organization is included on the list as eligible to receive contributions from the tax credit provided pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20, it shall submit to the department a five-year plan detailing the financial viability and stability of the rural hospital organization. The criteria to be included in the five-year plan shall be established by the department.

The department shall create an operations manual for identifying rural hospital organizations and ranking such rural hospital organizations in order of financial need. Such manual shall include:

All deadlines for submitting required information to the department;

The criteria to be included in the five-year plan submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection; and

The formula applied to rank the rural hospital organizations in order of financial need.

A rural hospital organization that receives donations pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20 shall:

All contributions received from individual and corporate donors pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20 detailing the manner in which the contributions received were expended by the rural hospital organization; and

Any payments made to a third party to solicit, administer, or manage the donations received by the rural hospital organization pursuant to this Code section or Code Section 48-7-29.20. In no event shall payments made to a third party to solicit, administer, or manage the donations received pursuant to this Code section exceed 3 percent of the total amount of the donations.

The department shall annually prepare a report compiling the information received pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection for the chairpersons of the House Committee on Ways and Means and the Senate Health and Human Services Committee.

The department shall post the following information in a prominent location on its website:

The list of rural hospital organizations eligible to receive contributions established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section;

The operations manual created pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section;

The annual report prepared pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section;

The total amount received by each third party that participated in soliciting, administering, or managing donations; and

A link to the Department of Revenue’s website containing the information included in subsection (d) of Code Section 48-7-29.20.

(A)

Utilize such donations for the provision of health care related services for residents of a rural county or for residents of the area served by a critical access hospital; and

(B)

Report on a form provided by the department:

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 511, § 1/SB 180; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-14/HB 186; Ga. L. 2019, p. 183, § 3/HB 321.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 8, 2017.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added paragraph (b)(3) and subsection (d). The second 2019 amendment, effective April 25, 2019, deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(F); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subparagraph (a)(3)(G); and added subparagraph (a)(3)(H), paragraph (b)(3), and subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 54(e)/HB 323, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2017 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subparagraph (c)(1)(A) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31(7)/HB 323, was not given effect.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 511, § 1/SB 180, effective May 8, 2017, repealed former Code Section

31-8-9.1

, pertaining to eligibility to receive tax credits and obligations of rural hospitals after receipt of those funds, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

31-8-9.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 166, § 1/SB 258.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 511, § 3/SB 180, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Code section “shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017.”

31-8-10.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-2307, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-8-11.
Construction of article.

This article shall not be construed as replacing federal, state, or local programs for the indigent but may supplement such programs for hospital care of the indigent.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 470, § 14; Code 1933, § 88-2312, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.